Utah, session 2026, HB106.
Section 1. Section 53G-6-213 is enacted to read:53G-6-213. Chronic absenteeism study.(1)As used in this section, "chronic absenteeism" means a student missing 10% or more of school days in an academic year, regardless of whether the absences are excused or unexcused.(2)Beginning with the 2026-2027 school year, an LEA shall annually collect and report to the state board the following data regarding chronic absenteeism:(a)the total number of students enrolled in each school within the LEA;(b)disaggregated by grade level, the total number and percentage of students in each school within the LEA who are chronically absent; and(c)for each chronically absent student:(i)the total number of days absent; and(ii)the number of days absent that were excused.(3)The state board shall:(a)develop a standardized reporting template for an LEA to use in submitting the data required under Subsection (2); and(b)annually publish aggregated, anonymized data on chronic absenteeism statewide on the state board's website.(4)(a)The state board shall conduct a study of chronic absenteeism in the state.(b)The state board shall ensure the study required in Subsection (4)(a):(i)analyzes the data an LEA reports in accordance with Subsection (2) to identify trends and patterns of chronic absenteeism across the state;(ii)researches and identifies evidence-based interventions and best practices for addressing chronic absenteeism, including strategies for:(A)prevention;(B)early intervention; and (C)student re-engagement;(iii)examines the root causes of chronic absenteeism, including:(A)socioeconomic factors;(B)transportation related issues;(C)mental health factors;(D)accessibility to health care;(E)family issues; and(F)general student disengagement; and(iv)consults stakeholders in conducting the study, including:(A)educators;(B)school and LEA level administrators;(C)other state entities as the state board determines;(D)parents and students;(E)community organizations; and(F)and other relevant stakeholders as the state board determines.(5)(a)No later than September 15, 2027, the state board shall submit a report to the Education Interim Committee detailing the findings and recommendations from the study described in Subsection (4).(b)The state board shall include in the report:(i)a summary of the data collected and analyzed;(ii)an analysis of the root causes of chronic absenteeism;(iii)a description of evidence-based interventions and best practices for addressing chronic absenteeism connected to the root causes, including specific recommendations for an LEA;(iv)if any, proposed legislation or policy changes needed to address chronic absenteeism and the root causes effectively; and(v)recommendations for professional development and training for educators and school level administrators on addressing chronic absenteeism.

Section 2:
Section 2.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.